Montana, session 2025, HB247.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 27-1-301, MCA, is amended to read:
"27-1-301. Prescribed damages exclusive of exemplary damages and interest. The damages
prescribed by 27-1-204, 27-1-222, 27-1-223, and this part are exclusive of exemplary damages and interest
except where those are expressly mentioned."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Repealer. The following section of the Montana Code Annotated is
repealed:
27-1-223. Damages for injuries or death inflicted in duel.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 247